Washington statutes.
RCW 34.05.345

Failure to give twenty days notice of intended action—Effect.

Except for emergency rules adopted under RCW 34.05.350, when twenty days notice of intended action to adopt, amend, or repeal a rule has not been published in the state register, as required by RCW 34.05.320, the code reviser shall not publish such rule and such rule shall not be effective for any purpose.

[ 1988 c 288 s 308; 1967 c 237 s 4. Formerly RCW 34.04.027.]